North Carolina, session 2025, SB315.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 58-50-61 reads as rewritten:
"§ 58-50-61. Utilization review.
(a) Definitions. – As used The following definitions apply in this section, in
G.S. 58-50-62, and in Part 4 of this Article, the term:Article:
…
(16a) Urgent health care service. – A health care service with respect to which the
application of the time periods for making an urgent care determination that,
in the opinion of a physician with knowledge of the covered person's medical
condition, meets either of the following criteria:
a. Could seriously jeopardize the life or health of the covered person or
the ability of the covered person to regain maximum function.
b. Would subject the covered person to severe pain that cannot be
adequately managed without the care or treatment that is the subject
of the utilization review.
…
(f) Time Lines for Prospective and Concurrent Utilization Reviews Based Upon Type of
Health Care Service. – As used in this subsection, the term "necessary information" includes the
results of any patient examination, clinical evaluation, or second opinion that may be required.
Prospective and concurrent determinations shall be communicated to The time line for
completion of a prospective or concurrent utilization review is as follows:
(1) Non-urgent health care services. – If an insurer requires a utilization review of
a healthcare service, then the insurer or its URO shall both render a utilization
review determination or noncertification and notify the covered person and the
covered person's provider within three business days after the insurer obtains
all necessary information about the admission, procedure, or health care
service. to make the utilization review determination or noncertification.
(2) Urgent health care services. – An insurer or its URO shall both render a
utilization review determination or noncertification concerning urgent health
care services and notify the covered person and the covered person's provider
of that utilization review determination or noncertification not later than 24
hours after receiving all necessary information needed to complete the review
of the requested health care services. If the covered person's provider or the
*S315-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
insurer, or the entity conducting the review on behalf of the insurer, do not
both have access to the electronic health records of the covered person, then
this subdivision shall not apply and the utilization review will be subject to
the time line under subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(f1) Utilization Review Determination Notifications. – If an insurer or its URO certifies a
health care service, the insurer shall notify notification shall be sent to the covered person's
provider. For If an insurer or its URO issues a noncertification, the insurer shall notify the covered
person's provider and send then written or electronic confirmation of the noncertification to the
covered person's provider and covered person. In person that is in compliance with subsection
(h) of this section.
(f2) Concurrent Review Liability. – For concurrent reviews, the insurer shall remain liable
for health care healthcare services until the covered person has been notified of the
noncertification.
…
(j1) Requirements Applicable to Appeals Reviews. – All of the following requirements
apply to an appeals review:
(1) Except as otherwise provided, appeals shall be reviewed by a medical doctor
who meets all of the following criteria:
a. Possesses a current and valid non-restricted license to practice
medicine in any United States jurisdiction.
b. Has practiced for a period of at least three consecutive years in the
same or similar specialty as a medical doctor who typically manages
the medical condition or disease for which utilization review is
required or whose training and experience meets all of the following
criteria:
1. Includes treatment of the same condition as the condition of
the covered person.
2. Includes treatment of complications that may result from the
service or procedure that is the subject of the appeal.
3. Is sufficient for the medical doctor to determine if the service
or procedure is medically necessary or clinically appropriate.
c. Had no direct involvement in making any prior adverse determination
or noncertification.
d. Has no financial interest, or other conflict of interest, in the outcome
of the appeal.
(2) Appeals initiated by a licensed mental health professional for a service
provided by a licensed mental health professional may be reviewed by a
licensed mental health professional rather than a medical doctor. The
requirements of subdivision (1) of this subsection shall apply to the reviewing
licensed mental health professional in the same manner that they apply to a
medical doctor.
(3) The medical doctor or licensed mental health professional shall consider all
known clinical aspects of the healthcare service under review, including all
pertinent medical records and any medical literature that have been provided
by the covered person's provider or by a health care facility.
…
(m) Disclosure of Utilization Review Requirements. – All of the following apply to an
insurer's responsibility to disclose any utilization review procedures:
(1) Coverage and member handbook. – In the certificate of coverage and member
handbook provided to covered persons, an insurer shall include a clear and
comprehensive description of its utilization review procedures, including the
Page 2 Senate Bill 315-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
procedures for appealing noncertifications and a statement of the rights and
responsibilities of covered persons, including the voluntary nature of the
appeal process, with respect to those procedures. An insurer shall also include
in the certificate of coverage and the member handbook information about the
availability of assistance from the Department's Health Insurance Smart NC,
including the telephone number and address of the Program. program.
(2) Prospective materials. – An insurer shall include a summary of its utilization
review procedures in materials intended for prospective covered persons.
(3) Membership cards. – An insurer shall print on its membership cards a toll-free
telephone number to call for utilization review purposes.
(4) Website. – An insurer shall make any current utilization review requirements
and restrictions readily accessible on its website.
(m1) Changes to Utilization Review. – If an insurer intends either to implement a new
utilization review requirement or restriction or to amend an existing requirement or restriction,
then the new or amended requirement shall not be in effect unless and until the insurer's website
has been updated to reflect the new or amended requirement or restriction. A claim shall not be
denied for failure to obtain a prior authorization if the prior authorization requirement or amended
requirement was not in effect on the date of service of the claim.
…
(n1) Utilization Review Determination Validity. – All of the following apply to the length
of time an approved prior authorization shall remain valid under certain circumstances:
(1) If a covered person enrolls in a new health benefit plan offered by the same
insurer under which the prior authorization was approved, then the previously
approved prior authorization remains valid for the initial 90 days of coverage
under the new heath benefit plan. This section does not require coverage of a
service if it is not a covered service under the new health benefit plan.
(2) If a healthcare service, other than for in-patient care, requires prior
authorization and is for the treatment of a covered person's chronic condition,
then the prior authorization shall remain valid for no less than six months from
the date the healthcare provider receives notification of the prior authorization
approval.
…
(o) Violation. – A In accordance with this Chapter, a violation of this section subjects an
insurer and an agent of the insurer to G.S. 58-2-70.
(p) Federal Rule Alignment. – No later than January 1, 2028, an insurer offering a health
benefit plan or a utilization review agent acting on behalf of an insurer offering a health benefit
plan, shall implement and maintain a prior authorization application programming interface
meeting the requirements under 45 C.F.R. § 156.223(b) as it existed on January 1, 2025, which
is to be in effect on January 1, 2028.
(q) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(r) Reserved for future codification purposes.
(s) Artificial Intelligence. – An insurer shall not use an artificial intelligence-based
algorithm as the sole basis for a utilization review determination to, in whole or in part, deny,
delay, or modify any healthcare services for an insured. Only individuals meeting the licensing
and qualification requirements for participating in the utilization review process under this
section shall make a determination regarding the medical necessity or appropriateness of any
healthcare service. Insurers shall verify that all contracts with a third party, including with a
pharmacy benefits manager, for conducting any utilization review are not in violation of this
subsection."
SECTION 1.(b) In accordance with G.S. 135-48.24(b) and G.S. 135-48.30(a)(7)
which require the State Treasurer to implement procedures that are substantially similar to the
Senate Bill 315-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
provisions of G.S. 58-50-61 for the North Carolina State Health Plan for Teachers and State
Employees (State Health Plan), the State Treasurer and the Executive Administrator of the State
Health Plan shall review all practices of the State Health Plan and all contracts with, and practices
of, any third party conducting any utilization review on behalf of the State Health Plan to ensure
compliance with subsection (a) of this section no later than the start of the next plan year.
SECTION 2. Section 1(a) of this act becomes effective October 1, 2026, and applies
to insurance contracts, including contracts with utilization review organizations, issued, renewed,
or amended on or after that date. The remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 4 Senate Bill 315-First Edition